Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.039

Public hearing—Time limitations.

(1) The county legislative authority of the county in which the proposed city or town is located shall hold a public hearing on the proposed incorporation if no boundary review board exists in the county. The public hearing shall be held within sixty days of when the county auditor notifies the legislative authority of the sufficiency of the petition if no boundary review board exists in the county, or within ninety days of when notice of the proposal is filed with the boundary review board if the boundary review board fails to take jurisdiction over the proposal. The public hearing may be continued to other days, not extending more than sixty days beyond the initial hearing date. If the boundary review board takes jurisdiction, the county legislative authority shall not hold a public hearing on the proposal.

(2) If the proposed city or town is located in more than one county, a public hearing shall be held in each of the counties by the county legislative authority or boundary review board. Joint public hearings may be held by two or more county legislative authorities, or two or more boundary review boards.

[ 1994 c 216 s 14; 1986 c 234 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.